Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1172.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 7702 of Title 75 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a definition to read:§ 7702. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have, unless the context clearly indicates otherwise, the meanings given to them in this section:* * *"Utility terrain vehicle" or "UTV." A motorized off-highway vehicle equipped with four or more tires, bucket or bench seats, not including a saddle, that has:(1) a maximum width of 64 inches and a maximum dry weight of 1,700 pounds; or123456789101112131415161718 (2) a width which exceeds 64 inches or a dry weight which exceeds 1,700 pounds.The term does not include an ATV, snowmobile, trail bike, motorboat, golf cart, aircraft, dune buggy, automobile, construction machine, truck or home utility machine; military, fire, emergency and law enforcement vehicle; implement of husbandry; multipurpose agricultural vehicle; vehicle used by the department; any vehicle that is or is required to be registered under Chapter 13; or an off-road motor vehicle used exclusively as a utility vehicle for an agricultural or business operation and incidentally operated or moved upon the highway.* * *Section 2. Section 7722 heading and (a) of Title 75 are amended to read:§ 7722. Designation of snowmobile, UTV and ATV roads.(a) [General rule.--The] Authority to designate.--(1) Except as provided under paragraph (2), the Department of Transportation on State-designated highways and local authorities on any highway, road or street within its jurisdiction may designate any highway, road or street within its jurisdiction as a snowmobile road, a UTV road, an ATV road, or [both] combination, and may, in its discretion, determine whether such road shall be closed to vehicular traffic or whether snowmobiles, UTV's and ATV's may share this designated road with vehicular traffic.(2) A county may, through the adoption of a resolution, designate a State-designated highway located within the boundaries of the county as a snowmobile road, a UTV road, an ATV road, or combination, on which snowmobiles, UTV's, ATV's or a combination may share the State-designated highway with 20250HB1172PN1309 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 vehicular traffic within the boundaries of the county.* * *Section 3. Section 7726(c) introductory paragraph and (5) of Title 75 are amended and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 7726. Operation in safe manner.* * *(c) Operation on highways and streets open to snowmobiles [or], UTV's, ATV's and vehicular traffic.--No person shall operate a snowmobile, UTV or ATV in any of the following ways on highways and streets open to snowmobiles, UTV's or ATV's and vehicular traffic:* * *[(5) Without a securely fastened helmet on the head of an individual who operates or is a passenger on a snowmobile or ATV or who is being towed or otherwise propelled by a snowmobile. The department shall specify the types of helmets allowed through rules and regulations.](d) Helmets.--(1) Except as provided under paragraph (2), an individual may not operate a snowmobile or ATV on highways and streets open to snowmobiles or ATV's and vehicular traffic without a securely fastened helmet on the head of the individual and any passenger on the snowmobile or ATV or being towed or otherwise propelled by the snowmobile or ATV.(2) A helmet is not required for an individual who is at least 18 years of age and operates or is a passenger on a UTV that is equipped with all of the following:(i) A bucket or bench seat in lieu of a saddle seat.(ii) A seat belt for the operator and each 20250HB1172PN1309 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 passenger.(iii) A roll cage.(3) The department shall specify the types of helmets allowed under this subsection through rules and regulations.Section 4. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1172PN1309 - 4 - 12345